California statutes. Vehicle Code
(c) The proceeds of any sale shall be allocated by the department for the following purposes and in the following order:

(1) Costs incurred by the department.

(2) Registration and transfer fees and any penalty added thereto.

(3) License fees and any penalty added thereto.

(4) Use taxes and any interest or penalty added thereto.

(5) Perfected mechanics’ liens.

(6) Perfected security interests.

(7) Penalties for
 offenses relating to the standing or parking of a vehicle and any administrative service fee added thereto. Any other court-induced liability, and any administrative service fee added thereto, which is subject to collection by the department.

(8) All other fees due the department.

(9) Any remainder to the person whose claim of interest in the vehicle is approved by the department.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 42270, the proceeds of a sale allocated pursuant to paragraphs (4) to (9), inclusive, of subdivision (c) shall not be transmitted to the Treasurer for deposit in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(e) The department shall transmit to the State Board of Equalization all use taxes, interest, and penalties collected under this
 article within 60 days after receipt thereof in the form which may be prescribed and approved jointly by the department and the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1199, Sec. 11.5.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

9803.

Nothing in this code prevents a review or other action as may be permitted by the Constitution and laws of this state by a court of competent jurisdiction of any order of the department to seize and sell a vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1212, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9804.

(a) Any action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction to review any order of the department to seize and sell a vehicle shall be commenced within 90 days from the date notice is given of the order.

(b) Upon final completion of all administrative appeals, the department shall give written notice to the owner of a vehicle ordered for seizure and sale of his or her right to a review of the order by a court pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1212, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9805.

(a) The department may file in the office of the Clerk of the Superior Court of Sacramento County, or any other county, a certificate specifying the amount of any fee, tax, penalty, and collection cost due, the name and last known address of the individual, company, or corporation liable for the amount due, and the fact that the department has complied with all the provisions of this division in the computation of the amount due, and a request that judgment be entered against the individual, company, or corporation in the amount of the fee,
 tax, penalty, and collection cost set forth in the certificate if the fee, tax, penalty, or collection cost constitutes either of the following:

(1) A lien under this division on the vehicle on which it is due is not paid when due, and there is evidence that the vehicle has been operated in violation of this code or any regulations adopted pursuant to this code.

(2) A lessee liability as provided in Section 10879 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) Prior to the filing of the certificate, the department shall, by mail, notify the individual, company, or corporation of the amount which is due and of the opportunity for a hearing as provided in this subdivision. At the request of the individual, company, or corporation, the department shall conduct a hearing pursuant to Section 9801, at which it shall be determined
 whether the claimed fee, tax, penalty, or collection cost in the amount claimed by the department is due and constitutes a lien on the vehicle, and whether the individual, company, or corporation is liable therefor.

(c) If no hearing is requested within 15 days after mailing the notice required by subdivision (b), the certificate required by subdivision (b) may be filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 593.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9806.

The clerk of the court, immediately upon the filing of the certificate specified in Section 9805, shall enter a judgment for the people of the State of California against the individual, company, or corporation in the amount of any fee, tax, penalty, and collection cost set forth in the certificate. The clerk may file the judgment in a looseleaf book entitled “Department of Motor Vehicles Registration Judgments.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 594.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9808.

Execution shall issue upon the judgment specified in Section 9806 upon request of the department in the same manner as execution may issue upon other judgments, and sales shall be held under the execution as prescribed in the Code of Civil Procedure, except that attachment may not issue against any real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 676, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3.5. REGISTRATION AND TRANSFER OF VESSELS [9840. - 9928.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [9840. - 9845.]

9840.

As used in this division, unless the context clearly requires a different meaning:

(a) “Vessel” includes every description of watercraft used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water, except the following:

(1) A seaplane on the water.

(2) A watercraft specifically designed to operate on a permanently fixed course, the movement of which is restricted to or guided on such permanently fixed course by means of a mechanical device on a fixed track or arm to which the watercraft is attached or by which the watercraft is controlled, or by means of a mechanical device attached to the watercraft itself.

(3) A floating structure which is designed and built to be used as a stationary waterborne residential dwelling, which (A) does not have and is not designed to have a mode of power of its own, (B) is dependent for utilities upon a continuous utility linkage to a source originating on shore, and (C) has a permanent, continuous hookup to a shoreside sewage system.

(b) “Owner” is a person having all the incidents of ownership, including the legal title, of a vessel whether or not such person lends, rents, or pledges such vessel; the person entitled to the possession of a vessel as the purchaser under a conditional sale contract; or the mortgagor of a vessel. “Owner” does not include a person holding legal title to a vessel under a conditional sales contract, the mortgagee of a vessel, or the renter or lessor of a vessel to the state or to any county, city, district, or political subdivision of the state under a lease, lease-sale, or rental-purchase agreement which grants possession of the vessel to the lessee for a period of 30 consecutive days or more.

(c) “Legal owner” is a person holding the legal title to a vessel under a conditional sale contract, the mortgagee of a vessel, or the renter or lessor of a vessel to the state, or to any county, city, district or political subdivision of the state, under a lease, lease-sale, or rental-purchase agreement which grants possession of the vessel to the lessee for a period of 30 consecutive days or more.

(d) “Registered owner” is the person registered by the department as the owner of the vessel.

(e) “Waters of this state” means any waters within the territorial limits of this state.

(f) “State of principal use” means the state on which waters a vessel is used or intended to be used most during a calendar year.

(g) “Undocumented vessel” means any vessel which is not required to have and does not have a valid marine document issued by the Bureau of Customs of the United States or any federal agency successor thereto.

(h) “Use” means operate, navigate, or employ.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 411, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9845.

The director, deputy director, registrar, deputy registrar, investigators of the department, and peace officers, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of the Penal Code, may inspect the hull identification number, certificate of number, and certificate of ownership of any vessel, as defined in Section 9840, when transported on a highway, or in any public garage, repair shop, public or private marina, dry storage facility, new or used vessel sales lot or boat yard, or other similar establishment for the purpose of investigating the ownership and registration of vessels, locating stolen vessels, and for inspection of wrecked, dismantled, or abandoned vessels. The authority to inspect pursuant to this section does not extend to any enclosed living area aboard a vessel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 298, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Registration [9850. - 9880.]

9850.

Every undocumented vessel using the waters or on the waters of this state shall be currently numbered. No person shall operate nor shall any county, city, or political subdivision give permission for the operation of any undocumented vessel on those waters unless the undocumented vessel is numbered in accordance with this chapter, or in accordance with applicable federal law, or in accordance with a federally approved numbering system of another state, and unless (1) the certificate of number issued to such undocumented vessel is in full force and effect, and (2) the identifying number set forth in the certificate
 of number is displayed on each side of the bow of the undocumented vessel for which the identifying number was issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 298, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9851.

The department may adopt rules and regulations for the registration of undocumented vessels belonging to the state, local public agencies, or to the United States without payment of fees specified in this code, except fees for duplicate certificates of ownership, duplicate certificates of number, or substitute current year registration stickers. Any vessel owned by the Department of Boating and Waterways is exempt from any fees specified in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 951, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 951.)
-------------------------------------------

9852.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations setting forth requirements relative to establishing proof of ownership to be submitted by the owner at the time of filing initial application for a certificate of number and a certificate of ownership. The issuance of a certificate of ownership or certificate of number under this chapter shall not in any way be construed that the department is warranting or guaranteeing the title of the vessel as it appears on such certificates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 759.)
-------------------------------------------

9852.5.

Ownership of an undocumented vessel subject to registration may be held by two or more coowners as follows:

(a) A vessel may be registered in the names of two or more persons as coowners in the alternative by the use of the word “or.” A vessel so registered in the alternative shall be deemed to be held in joint tenancy. Each coowner shall be deemed to have granted to the other coowners the absolute right to dispose of the title and interest in the vessel. Upon the death of a coowner the interest of the decedent shall pass to the survivor as though title or interest in the vessel was held in
 joint tenancy unless a contrary intention is set forth in writing upon the application for registration.

(b) A vessel may be registered in the names of two or more persons as coowners in the alternative by the use of the word “or” and if declared in writing upon the application for registration by the applicants to be community property, or tenancy in common, shall grant to each coowner the absolute power to transfer the title or interest of the other coowners only during the lifetime of such coowners.

(c) A vessel may be registered in the names of two or more persons as coowners in the conjunctive by the use of the word “and” and shall thereafter require the signature of each coowner or his personal representative to transfer title to the vessel, except where title to the vessel is set forth in joint tenancy, the signature of each coowner or his or her personal representative
 shall be required only during the lifetime of the coowners, and upon death of a coowner title shall pass to the surviving coowner.

(d) The department may adopt suitable abbreviations to appear upon the certificate of ownership and certificate of number to designate the manner in which title to the vessel is held if set forth by the coowners upon the application for registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 982, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

9852.7.

(a) Ownership of an undocumented vessel subject to registration may be held in beneficiary form that includes a direction to transfer ownership of the vessel to a designated beneficiary on death of the owner if both of the following requirements are satisfied: 

(1) Only one owner is designated. 

(2) Only one TOD beneficiary is designated. 

(b) Ownership registration and title issued in beneficiary form shall include, after the name of the
 owner, the words “transfer on death to” or the abbreviation “TOD” followed by the name of the beneficiary. 

(c) During the lifetime of the owner, the signature or consent of the beneficiary is not required for any transaction relating to the vessel for which a certificate of ownership in beneficiary form has been issued. 

(d) The fee for registering ownership of a vessel in a beneficiary form is ten dollars ($10).

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1055, Sec. 61.   Operative January 1, 1993, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 1055.)
-------------------------------------------

9852.9.

(a) On and after July 1, 2008, the form for an initial application for a number prepared by the department pursuant to Section 9853 shall include both of the following:

(1) Checkoff boxes or line alternatives for the retail seller of an undocumented vessel to certify that a sterndrive or inboard vessel that contains a spark-ignition marine engine below 373 kW (500 hp) rated power output that was manufactured on or after January 1, 2008, and a sterndrive
 or inboard vessel that contains a spark-ignition marine engine with any rated power output that was manufactured on or after January 1, 2009, has a permanently affixed label indicating that the engine meets or exceeds the 2008 California emissions standards required by Section 2442 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) A line requiring that an initial application for a vessel described in paragraph (1) be accompanied by the hang tag required by Section 2443.3 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations for the engine described in paragraph (1).

(b) As used in this section, “spark-ignition marine engine” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 9853.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 609, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Operative July 1, 2008, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

9853.

(a) The owner of each vessel requiring numbering by this state shall file an initial application for a number with the department or with an agent authorized by the department on forms approved by the department. The forms shall be prepared in cooperation with the Division of Boating and Waterways. The application shall contain the true name and address of the owner, the true name and address of the legal owner, if any, and the hull identification number of the vessel as may be required by the department. The application shall be signed by the owner of the vessel and shall be accompanied by a fee of nine dollars ($9), in addition to the fees required under subdivision (b).

(b) (1) Whenever the fee for original registration of a vessel
 becomes due between January 1 and December 31 of any even-numbered year, the application shall be accompanied by a fee of ten dollars ($10), in addition to any other fees that are then due and payable.

(2) Whenever the fee for original registration of a vessel becomes due, or is filed with the department, between January 1 and December 31 of any odd-numbered year, the application shall be accompanied by a fee of twenty dollars ($20) in addition to any other fees that are then due and payable.

(c) (1) The department shall collect, from resident and nonresident vessel owners, separate from the original registration fee, an invasive mussel infestation prevention fee in an amount established by the Division of Boating and Waterways pursuant to
 Section 675 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(2) Upon payment of the fee described in paragraph (1), the department shall issue a vessel an invasive mussel infestation prevention sticker to the vessel owner.

(3) Failure to pay the invasive mussel infestation prevention fee described in paragraph (1) does not prohibit the department from issuing registration of a vessel.

(4) (A) A vessel operator may be issued a citation for operating a recreational vessel in nonmarine waters without a valid state-issued invasive mussel infestation prevention sticker.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a vessel that is exempt pursuant to
 Section 5211 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations shall not be cited pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(d) The department shall provide documentation of its administrative costs pursuant to this section to the Division of Boating and Waterways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 106, Sec. 17.   (AB 149)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9853.1.

Upon receipt of the application in approved form, the department shall issue a certificate of ownership to the legal owner and a certificate of number to the owner, or both to the owner if there is no legal owner, stating the number issued to the vessel and the name and address of the owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 759.)
-------------------------------------------

9853.2.

The owner shall paint on or attach to each side of the forward half of the vessel the identification number in such manner as may be prescribed by rules and regulations of the department in order that it may be clearly visible. Any such rules and regulations shall be developed in cooperation with the Department of Boating and Waterways. The number shall be maintained in a legible condition. The certificate of number shall be pocket size and shall be available at all times for inspection on the vessel for which issued, whenever the vessel is in use, except as to those vessels subject to Section 9853.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 206.)
-------------------------------------------

9853.3.

The certificate of number for vessels less than 26 feet in length and leased or rented to another for the latter’s noncommercial use of less than 24 hours may be retained on shore by the vessel’s owner or his representative at the place from which the vessel departs or returns to the possession of the owner or his representative. A copy of the lease or rental agreement signed by the owner or his authorized representative and by the person leasing or renting the vessel shall be carried aboard the vessel at all times during use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 759.)
-------------------------------------------

9853.4.

(a) The department may issue one or more stickers, tabs, or other suitable devices to identify vessels as being currently registered. The size, shape, and color of the sticker, tab, or other device and the positioning of the sticker, tab, or other device on the vessel shall be as determined by the department after consultation with the Department of Boating and Waterways, such consultation to consider the responsibilities and duties of the Department of Boating and Waterways as prescribed in the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(b) Whenever the department issues a sticker,
 tab, or other device pursuant to subdivision (a), the sticker, tab, or device shall only be displayed on the vessel for which it was issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 298, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9853.5.

Upon request, the department shall issue for any power-driven pleasure craft which is constructed of wood and which was constructed prior to December 31, 1942, a special plaque which identifies the craft as a vessel of historical interest. The provisions of this section shall apply to documented as well as undocumented vessels. The size, shape, and content of such plaque and its positioning on the vessel shall be determined by the department after consultation with the Department of Boating and Waterways; provided, that such plaque shall be of a durable material and shall be no smaller than six inches in height and six inches in width. A reasonable fee, as
 determined by the department, sufficient to support the administration of such program, shall be charged for issuance of the plaque. The plaque shall be valid for the life of the vessel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 577, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9853.7.

(a) (1) When the retail seller of an undocumented sterndrive or inboard vessel, that contains a spark-ignition marine engine below 373 kW (500 hp) rated power output that was manufactured on or after January 1, 2008, or contains a spark-ignition marine engine with any rated power output that was manufactured on or after January 1, 2009, files for the purchaser of the vessel the initial application for a number for the vessel, the retail seller shall do both of the following:

(A) Certify on that application, by marking in indelible ink the affirmative checkoff boxes or line alternatives described in subdivision (a) of Section 9852.9, that the spark-ignition marine engine has a permanently affixed label indicating that the engine meets or exceeds the 2008 California emissions standards required by Section 2442 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations. The retail seller shall make that certification only after examining the permanently affixed label for the engine and only if the label indicates compliance with Section 2442 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) Submit with the application, the hang tag required by Section 2443.3 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations for the engine, after including on the reserved white space of the hang tag, the engine family name, from the permanently affixed engine label, and the
 serial number of the engine.

(2) If the retail seller does not file for the purchaser of a vessel described in paragraph (1) the initial application for a number for the vessel, the applicant, upon filing an initial application for a number, shall submit the hang tag required by Section 2443.3 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations for the engine. The hang tag shall contain the engine family name, from the permanently affixed engine label, and the serial number of the engine, as inserted by the retail seller of the vessel.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a vessel originally purchased in another state by a resident of that state who subsequently establishes residence in this state and who provides satisfactory evidence to the department, or the department’s agent authorized pursuant to Section 9858, of the previous residence.

(c) The department, and the department’s agent authorized pursuant to Section 9858, shall not number a vessel subject to subdivision (a), unless the retail seller certifies on the initial application for a number filed for the purchaser of the vessel that the spark-ignition marine engine has the label described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) permanently affixed to the engine, or the applicant submits an application that is accompanied by the hang tag required by subdivision (a).

(d) For the purposes of this section, “spark-ignition marine engine” has the same meaning as that term is defined in paragraph (48) of subdivision (a) of Section 2441 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 609, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Operative July 1, 2008, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

9853.8.

(a) This section applies only to a sterndrive or inboard vessel that contains a spark-ignition marine engine below 373 kW (500 hp) rated power output that was manufactured on or after January 1, 2008, or contains a spark-ignition marine engine with any rated power output that was manufactured on or after January 1, 2009.

(b) It is an infraction, punishable by a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), for a person to operate an undocumented vessel,
 requiring numbering by the state, that is not currently numbered by the state, and that does not comply with the emissions standards required by Section 2442 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) As used in this section, “spark-ignition marine engine” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 9853.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 609, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Operative July 1, 2008, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

9854.

The owner of any vessel already covered by a number in full force and effect that has been issued to it pursuant to then operative federal law or a federally approved numbering system of another state shall make application within 30 days after the 60-day reciprocity period provided for in Section 9873. Such application shall be in a manner and pursuant to the procedure required for the issuance of a number under
 Section 9853.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 66.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

9855.

If the ownership of an undocumented vessel changes, the existing certificate of ownership and a new application form accompanied by a fee of fifteen dollars ($15) shall be filed with the department and a new certificate of ownership and a new certificate of number shall be issued in the same manner as provided for in the initial issuance of number and the number shall be reassigned to the new owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 951, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 951.)
-------------------------------------------

9856.

(a) It is not required that the department issue, or that an application be made for a new certificate of ownership or a new certificate of number, or that the fee prescribed in Section 9855 be paid on transfer of an undocumented vessel to a dealer in the course of his business as is otherwise provided in this division, if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The vessel is held and operated by the dealer only for the purpose of resale in the course of his business.

(2) The dealer has been
 issued a sales permit by the Board of Equalization covering sale of such property.

(b) The certificate of ownership bearing the endorsement of the transferor to the dealer of a vessel registered pursuant to this section and the certificate of number thereof shall be retained by the dealer until a transfer of the vessel by him. During that time the certificates shall be subject to inspection by the department or other authorized agency. Upon transfer of the vessel by the dealer the certificate of ownership shall be endorsed by the dealer and transfer further accomplished as otherwise provided in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 411, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9857.

If an agency of the United States government shall have in force an overall system of identification numbering for undocumented vessels within the United States, the numbering system employed pursuant to this chapter shall be in conformity therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9858.

The department may issue any certificate of ownership and certificate of number or temporary certificate of number directly or the department may authorize any person to act as agent for the issuance of a certificate of number or temporary certificate of number. If a person accepts such authorization, he may be assigned a block of numbers which upon issuance, in conformity with this chapter and with any rules and regulations of the department, shall be valid as if issued directly by the department. Registration of vessels pursuant to the provisions of this code shall be conducted by the department or by any agent authorized by the department to conduct such
 registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9858.1.

Any documentary preparation charge by an authorized agent of the department shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20).

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1407, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9858.5.

Any licensed yacht and ship broker acting as an authorized agent of the department may collect use tax on a vessel transfer when applicable, and transmit the use tax and the registration application and applicable fees to the department, or may submit the registration application and applicable fees to the department for collection of any use tax due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 665, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

9859.

All money received by an agent from the sale of certificates of number or temporary certificates of number and use tax shall be kept separate and apart from any other funds of the agent, and shall at all times belong to the state.

In case of an assignment for the benefit of creditors, receivership, or bankruptcy, the state shall have a preferred claim against the assignee, receiver, or
 trustee for all moneys owing the state for the sale of certificates as provided in this code and any use tax, and shall not be estopped from asserting such claim by reason of the commingling of funds or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 61.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

9860.

(a) Certificates of number shall be renewed before midnight of the expiration date by presentation of the certificate of number last issued for the vessel or by presentation of a potential registration card issued by the department.

(b) The fee for renewal shall be twenty dollars ($20) for each two-year period, and shall accompany the request for renewal.

(c) If the certificate of number and potential registration card are unavailable, the fee specified in Section 9867 shall not be paid.

(d) (1) The department shall collect, from resident and nonresident
 vessel owners, separate from the fee for renewal,
 an invasive mussel infestation prevention fee in an amount established by the Department of Boating and Waterways pursuant to Section 675 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(2) Failure to pay the fee described in this subdivision does not prohibit the department from issuing renewal registration of the vessel.

(3) (A) A vessel operator may be issued a citation for operating the vessel in nonmarine waters without a valid state-issued invasive mussel infestation prevention sticker.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), a vessel that is exempt pursuant to Section 5211 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations shall not be cited pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(e) The department shall provide documentation of its administrative costs pursuant to this section to the Department of Boating and Waterways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 106, Sec. 18.   (AB 149)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9861.

All certificates of number expire on December 31 of every odd-numbered year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 473, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

9862.

(a) If the initial application for a number is not received by the department on or before the date set by the department, a penalty of one-half of the fee shall be assessed. If a certificate of number is not renewed on or before midnight of the expiration date, a penalty of one-half of the fee shall be assessed.

(b) If any person has received as the transferee of a vessel a properly endorsed certificate of ownership and certificate of number describing that vessel and the transfer fee has not been paid as required by this code within 30 days,
 a penalty of one-half of the transfer fee specified in Section 9855 shall be assessed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1352, Sec. 14.   Effective September 27, 1990.   Applicable from July 1, 1990, pursuant to Sec. 21 of Ch. 1352.)
-------------------------------------------

9862.5.

In computing any penalty imposed under this chapter, a fraction of a dollar shall be disregarded unless it equals or exceeds fifty cents ($0.50), in which case it shall be treated as one dollar ($1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 825, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9863.

(a) Except as required under subdivisions (b) and (c), and except moneys collected under Section 9875, fees received pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund and, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for the administration of this chapter by the department. Funds in the Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund derived pursuant to this chapter in excess of the amount determined by the Director of Finance, from time to time, to be necessary for expenditure for the administration of this chapter, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, are continuously appropriated to the Department of Boating and Waterways,
 without regard to fiscal years, for expenditure in accordance with Section 663.7 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(b) Funds derived from imposition of the biennial registration fee under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 9853, or under subdivision (b) of Section 9860, shall be distributed as follows:

(1) One-half shall be continuously appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) One-half shall be allocated, upon appropriation, to the Department of Boating and Waterways for expenditure in support of programs under the department’s jurisdiction.

(c) Funds derived from the imposition of the invasive mussel prevention fee under subdivision
 (c) of Section 9853, or under subdivision (d) of Section 9860, shall be distributed as specified in Section 676 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 106, Sec. 19.   (AB 149)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

9864.

The owner shall furnish the department notice of the wrecking or dismantling, or the destruction or abandonment of an undocumented vessel within 15 days thereof. The wrecking, dismantling, destruction or abandonment shall terminate the certificate of ownership and certificate of number of such undocumented vessel which if in existence shall be surrendered to the department.

The department, upon receiving notice of the abandonment of an undocumented vessel, or upon an official determination that an undocumented vessel has been abandoned, may order the destruction of such vessel at the expiration of 30 days if an
 investigation by the department has disclosed that no owner, legal owner, or lienholder claims an interest in the vessel, or if those persons have waived their interest. Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny the legal rights, otherwise provided for by law, of any person claiming an interest in an abandoned vessel if that person notifies the department within the time specified therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 298, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

9865.

Any holder of a certificate of number shall notify the department within 15 days, if his address no longer conforms to the address appearing on the certificate and shall, as part of such notification, furnish the department with his new address. The department may provide for the surrender of the certificate bearing the former address and its replacement with a certificate bearing the new address or for the alteration of an outstanding certificate to show the new address of the holder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 759.)
-------------------------------------------

9866.

No number other than the number issued to an undocumented vessel or granted reciprocity pursuant to this chapter shall be painted, attached, or otherwise displayed on either side of the bow of such undocumented vessel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9867.

A fee of fifteen dollars ($15) shall be charged for a duplicate of certificate of number, certificate of ownership, or current year registration stickers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 951, Sec. 4.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 951.)
-------------------------------------------

9867.5.

Upon application for transfer of registration pursuant to Section 9917, a fee as specified in Section 9867 shall be paid to the department in addition to the regular transfer fee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

9868.

Fees received pursuant to this chapter are appropriated for payment of refunds of money received or collected in the payment of fees, permits, or services whenever the fee, permit or service cannot lawfully be issued or rendered to the applicant, and in cases where the payment in whole or in part represents overpayment or payment in duplicate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9869.

The department shall transmit information from each initial application and each transfer application or renewal application to the county assessor in the county of residence of the owner of the vessel and to the county assessor in the county in which the vessel is principally kept if other than the county of residence of the owner, if such other county is known to the department. If an application shows that the owner of the vessel has changed his residence from one county to another county or shows that there has been a change in the county in which the vessel is principally kept, the department shall transmit information of the change to the assessor of the county in which
 the owner of the vessel formerly resided or to the assessor of the county in which the vessel formerly was principally kept. After the department receives a notice pursuant to Section 9864, the department shall transmit information of the destruction or abandonment to the assessor of the county in which the owner of the vessel resides and to the assessor of the county in which the vessel is or was principally kept, if other than the county of residence of the owner, if such other county was known to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1428.)
-------------------------------------------

9870.
